Project Gutenberg's Rosemary, by C. N. Williamson and A. M. Williamson

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: Rosemary
       A Christmas story

Author: C. N. Williamson and A. M. Williamson

Illustrator: William Hatherell

Release Date: February 10, 2006 [EBook #17743]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ROSEMARY ***




Produced by Suzanne Shell, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net











ROSEMARY: A CHRISTMAS STORY

[Illustration: Evelyn and Rosemary climbed hand in hand, while Hugh
carried the two huge baskets.

_Frontispiece._                                       --_Rosemary._]




  ROSEMARY
  A Christmas Story


  By
  C. N. and A. M. WILLIAMSON

  [Illustration]

  With Eight Illustrations
  By WILLIAM HATHERELL

  NEW YORK
  A. L. BURT COMPANY
  PUBLISHERS

  _Copyright, 1906, by McClure, Phillips & Co._




_To Minda_




CONTENTS

[Illustration: Contents]

CHAPTER                                                         PAGE

   I. THE WHITE GIRL ON THE TERRACE: THE ROSE GIRL AT THE CASINO   3

  II. THE ROSE GIRL'S LITTLE STORY, AND GREAT EYES                21

 III. WHEN THE CURTAIN WAS DOWN                                   40

  IV. DOGS AND FATHERS                                            48

   V. ROSEMARY IN SEARCH OF A FATHER                              62

  VI. FAIRY FATHERS MUST VANISH                                   78

 VII. THE WHITE FIGURE AT THE DOOR                                94

VIII. WHEN A MAN GOES SHOPPING                                   108

  IX. THE LAST WORD OF MADEMOISELLE                              128




ILLUSTRATIONS

[Illustration: Illustrations]

  EVELYN AND ROSEMARY CLIMBED HAND IN HAND, WHILE HUGH CARRIED
    TWO HUGE BASKETS                                      _Frontispiece_

                                                                 FACING
                                                                  PAGE

  HE TOOK OFF HALF, AND WAS LEAVING THE REST TO RUN, WHEN A
    VOICE CLOSE TO HIS SHOULDER, SAID, "OH, DO TAKE IT ALL OFF"    12

  WITH A CRASH OF MACHINERY HE BROUGHT THE BIG BLUE CAR TO
    A STOP                                                         70

  HE CRUSHED THEM IN HIS, THEN BENT HIS HEAD AND KISSED THEM      102

  THEY CAME NEARER, NEAR ENOUGH FOR MADEMOISELLE TO RECOGNISE
    THE MAN WITH THEM                                             124

  THEIR FLUFFY LACES BURNT AND BLACKENED. CHIFFON FICHUS TORN
    IN RIBBONS STREWED THE CARPET                                 138




[Illustration: CHAPTER ONE]

THE WHITE GIRL ON THE TERRACE: THE ROSE GIRL AT THE CASINO


[Illustration: T]

There was a young man in Monte Carlo. He had come in a motor car, and he
had come a long way, but he hardly knew why he had come. He hardly knew
in these days why he did anything. But then, one must do something.

It would be Christmas soon, and he thought that he would rather get it
over on the Riviera than anywhere else, because the blue and gold
weather would not remind him of other Christmases which were gone--pure,
white, cold Christmases, musical with joy-bells and sweet with aromatic
pine, the scent of trees born to be Christmas trees.

There had been a time when he had fancied it would be a wonderful thing
to see the Riviera. He had thought what it would be like to be a rich
man, and bring a certain girl here for a moon of honey and roses.

She was the most beautiful girl in the world, or he believed her so,
which is exactly the same thing; and he had imagined the joy of walking
with her on just such a terrace as this Casino terrace where he was
walking now, alone. She would be in white, with one of those long ermine
things that women call stoles; an ermine muff (the big, "granny" kind
that swallows girlish arms up to the dimples in their elbows) and a hat
which they would have bought together in Paris.

They would have bought jewels, too, in the same street where they found
the hat; the Rue de la Paix, which she had told him she longed to see.
And she would be wearing some of the jewels with the white dress--just a
few, not many, of course. A string of pearls (she loved pearls) a
swallow brooch (he had heard her say she admired those swallow brooches,
and he never forgot anything she said); with perhaps a sapphire-studded
buckle on her white suéde belt. Yes, that would be all, except the
rings, which would lie hidden under her gloves, on the dear little hands
whose nails were like enamelled rose leaves.

When she moved, walking beside him on the terrace, there would be a
mysterious silky whisper and rustle, something like that you hear in the
woods, in the spring, when the leaves are crisp with their pale green
youth, and you shut your eyes, listening to the breeze telling them the
secrets of life.

There would be a fragrance about the white dress and the laces, and
ermine, and the silk things that you could not see,--a fragrance as
mysterious as the rustling, for it would seem to belong to the girl, and
not to have come from any bottle, or bag of sachet powder. A sweet,
fresh, indefinable fragrance, like the smell of a tea rose after rain.

They would have walked together, they two, and he would have been so
proud of her, that every time a passer-by cast a glance of admiration at
her face, he would feel that he could hardly keep in a laugh of joy, or
a shout, "She is mine--she is mine."

But he had been poor in the old days, when from far away he had thought
of this terrace, and the moon of honey and roses, and love. It had all
been a dream, then, as it was now; too sweet ever to come true.

He thought of the dream, and of the boy who had dreamed it, half
bitterly, half sadly, on this his first day in the place of the dream.

He was rich--as rich as he had seen himself in the impossible picture,
and it would have been almost too easy to buy the white dress, and the
ermine, and the pearls. But there was no one for whom he would have been
happy to buy them. The most beautiful girl in the world was not in his
world now; and none other had had the password to open the door of his
heart since she had gone out, locking it behind her.

"She would have liked the auto," he said to himself. And then, a moment
later, "I wonder why I came?"

It was a perfect Riviera day. Everybody in Monte Carlo who was not in
the Casino was sauntering on the terrace in the sun; for it was that
hour before luncheon when people like to say, "How do you do?--How nice
to meet you here!" to their friends.

The young man from far away had not, so far as he knew, either enemies
or friends at Monte Carlo. He was not conscious of the slightest desire
to say "How do you do?" to any of the pretty people he met, although
there is a superstition that every soul longs for kindred souls at
Christmas time.

He had not been actively unhappy before he left the Hotel de Paris and
strolled out on the terrace, to have his first sight of Monte Carlo by
daylight. Always, there was the sore spot in his heart, and often it
ached almost unbearably at night, or when the world hurt him with its
beauty, which he must see without Her; but usually he kept the spot
well covered up; and being healthy as well as young, he had cultivated
that kind of contentment which Thoreau said was only desperate
resignation in disguise. He took an interest in books, in politics, and
sport and motor cars, and a good many other things; but on the terrace,
the blue of the sea; the opal lights on the mountains; the gold glint of
oranges among green, glittering leaves; the pearly glimmer of white
roses thrown up like a spray against the sky, struck at his heart, and
made the ache come back more sharply than it had for a long time.

If he had been a girl, tears would have blinded his eyes; but being what
he was, he merely muttered in anger against himself, "Hang it all, what
a wretched ass I am," and turning his back on the sea, made his way as
fast as he could into the Casino.

It was close upon twelve o'clock, and the "Rooms" had been open to the
public for two hours. The "early gamblers" thronging the Atrium to wait
till the doors opened, had run in and snatched seats for themselves at
the first tables, or marked places to begin at eleven o'clock, if
crowded away from the first. Later, less ardent enthusiasts had strolled
in; and now, though it was not by any means the "high season" yet, there
were rows of players or lookers on, three deep round each table.

The young man was from the South--though a South very different from
this. He had the warm blood of Virginia in his veins, and just so much
of the gambler's spirit as cannot be divided from a certain recklessness
in a man with a temperament. He had seen plenty of life in his own
country, in the nine years since he was twenty, and he knew all about
roulette and _trente et quarante_, among other things desirable and
undesirable.

Still, gambling seemed to be made particularly fascinating here, and he
wanted to be fascinated, wanted it badly. He was in the mood for the
heavy hush of the Rooms, for the closeness, and the rich perfumes, which
mingling together seem like the smell of money piled on the green
tables; he was in a mood for the dimmed light like dull gold, gold
sifted into dust by passing through many hands.

He had got his ticket of admission to the Casino, after arriving
yesterday evening; but the Rooms had not pleased him then. He had not
played, and had merely walked through, looking at the people; but now he
went to a _trente et quarante_ table, and reaching over the shoulders of
the players--not so many as in the roulette rooms,--he put a five
hundred franc note on _couleur_. It won. He let the money lie, and it
won again. A third time and a fourth he left the notes on, and still
luck was with him. He was in for a good run.

As it happened, nobody else had been playing higher than _plaques_, the
handsome hundred franc gold pieces coined for the Principality of
Monaco; and people began to watch the new comer, as they always do one
who plays high and is lucky. On the fifth deal he had won the maximum.
He took off half, and was leaving the rest to run, when a voice close to
his shoulder said, "Oh, do take it all off. I feel it's going to lose
now. To please _me_."

[Illustration: He took off half, and was leaving the rest to run, when a
voice close to his shoulder said, "Oh, do take it all off."   Page 12.

                                                          --_Rosemary._]

He glanced aside, and saw an exceedingly pretty, dark face, which looked
vaguely familiar. With a smile, he took up all the notes, and only just
in time. Couleur lost; inverse won.

"Oh, I'm so glad," said the owner of the pretty face. She spoke English
with a slight, but bewitching foreign accent; and her eyes shone at him
like brown jewels under the tilted brim of a hat made all of pink and
crimson roses. She was rather like a rose, too, a rich, colourful, spicy
rose, of the kind which unfolds early. He knew that he had seen her
before, and wondered where.

After all, it was rather nice to be spoken to by someone other than a
hotel manager or a waiter; someone who was good to look at, and
friendly. He lost interest in the game, and gained interest in the girl.

"Thank you," said he. "You've brought me luck."

"I hope you don't think I speak always to strangers, like that," said
the girl in the rose hat. "But you see, I recognized you at once. I
don't know if you remember me? No, I'm afraid you don't."

"Of course I remember you, only I can't think where we--"

"Why, it was in Paris. You saved my mother's little dog from being run
over one day. We were both so grateful. Afterwards we saw you once or
twice at tea at the Ritz, and you took off your hat, so you must have
remembered then. Ah me, it's a long time ago!"

"Not so very," said the young man. "I remember well, now." (He wished
her mother had not been quite such an appalling person, fat and
painted.) "It was only last October. I'd just come to Paris. It was my
first day there, when I picked up the little dog. Now, on my first day
here, you pay me back for what I did then--as if it needed paying
back!--by making me pick up my money. That's quite a coincidence."

They had moved away from the tables now, and were walking very slowly
down the room. The young man smiled at the girl, as he crushed up the
notes and stuffed them into his pocket. He saw that she was much
prettier than he had thought her in Paris, if he had thought of her at
all; and her dress of pale pink cloth was charming with the rose hat.
Somehow, he was glad that she was not in white--with an ermine stole.

"So it is, quite a coincidence, and a pleasant one for me, since I meet
again one who was once so kind," she said. "Especially it is good to
meet a friend--if I may call you a friend?--when one is very sad."

"Of course you may call me a friend," said he, kindly. "I'm sorry to
hear you are sad."

"That is why I told you the other meeting seemed a long time ago,"
explained the girl. "I was happy then. Now, I am breaking my heart, and
I do not know what to do. Oh, I ought not to talk like this, for after
all, you are a stranger. But you are English, or you are American; and
men of those countries never misunderstand a woman, even if she is in
trouble. We can feel ourselves safe with them."

"I'm American," he answered, "and I'm glad you feel like that. I wish I
could help you in some way." He spoke kindly, but not with absolute
warmth of sincerity. The girl saw this, and knew that he did not believe
in her as she wished him to believe, as she intended to make him
believe.

She looked up at him with sad and eloquent eyes, which softened his
heart in spite of himself. "You can't help me, thank you," she said,
"except by kind words and kind thoughts. I think, though, that it would
do me good to tell you things, if you really take an interest?"

"Of course I do." He was speaking the truth now. He was human, and she
was growing prettier, as she grew more pathetic, every moment.

"And would you advise me a little? I have nobody else to ask. My mother
and I know no one at Monte Carlo. Perhaps you would walk with me on the
terrace and let me talk?"

"Not on the terrace," he said, quickly, for he could not bear to meet
the sweet ghost of the past in the white dress and ermine stole, as he
gave advice to the flesh and blood reality of the present, in the pink
frock and roses. "What about Ciro's? Couldn't we find your mother
somewhere, and get her to chaperon us for lunch? I should think it must
be very jolly now, in the Galerie Charles Trois."

"So it would be; but my poor mother is very ill in her bed," said the
girl.

"Would she--er--do you think, as I'm an American, and we're almost old
friends, mind letting you have lunch just with me alone? Of course, if
she would mind, you must say no. But I must confess, I'm hungry as a
wolf; and it would be somewhere to sit and talk together, quietly, you
know."

"You are hungry," echoed the girl. "Ah, I would wager something that you
don't really know what hunger is. But I know--now."

"What do you mean?"

"I mean it is well my mother is ill, and doesn't wish to eat, for there
would be nothing for her, if she did."

"Good heavens! And you?"

"I have had nothing to eat since yesterday morning, and then only a
biscuit with a glass of water."

"My poor girl, we won't say anything more about chaperons. Come along
with me to Ciro's this instant, to lunch, and tell me everything."

He was completely won over now, and looked very handsome, with a slight
flush on his brown face, and his dark eyes bright with excitement.

The girl lowered her long lashes, perhaps to hide tears.

When she did this, and drooped the corners of her mouth, she was very
engaging, and the young man tingled all over with pity. That poor,
pretty creature, starving, in her charming pink dress and hat of roses.
How strange life was! It was something to be thankful for that he had
met her.

A little while ago, he had walked through the Galerie Charles Trois,
thinking how delightful the tables looked at Ciro's, and making up his
mind to return there for lunch. But afterwards, on the terrace, he had
been so miserable that he would probably have forgotten all about his
plan, if it had not been for the girl.

Now, he chose a small table in a corner of the balcony, close to the
glass screen. A month later, he might have had to engage it long
beforehand; but to-day, though the place was well filled with pretty
women and their attendant men, there was not a crowd, and he could
listen to his companion's low-voiced confidences without fear of being
overheard.




[Illustration: CHAPTER TWO]

THE ROSE GIRL'S LITTLE STORY, AND GREAT EYES


[Illustration: H]

He ordered a lunch which he thought the girl would like, with wine to
revive the faculties that he knew must be failing. Then, when she had
eaten a little, daintily in spite of her hunger, he encouraged her to
talk.

"Mother and I are all alone in the world," she said. "We are Belgian,
and live in Brussels, but we have drifted about a good deal, just
amusing ourselves. Somehow we never happened to come here until a month
ago. Then my mother said one day in Paris, 'Let us go to Monte Carlo. I
dreamed last night that I won twenty thousand francs there.' My mother
is rather superstitious. We came, and she did win, at first. She was
delighted, and believed in her dream, so much that when she began to
lose, she went up and up, doubling each time. They call the game she
made, 'playing the martingale!'

"She lost all the money we had with us, and telegraphed home for more.
Soon, she had sold out every one of our securities. Then she won, and
went half mad with the joy and excitement, but the joy didn't last long.
She lost all, again--literally, our all. We were penniless. There was
nothing left to pay the hotel bill. I went out, and found a _Mont de
Pieté_, just beyond the limits of the Principality; they aren't allowed
inside. I pawned all our jewellery, and as we had a great many valuable
things, I got several thousand francs. I thought the money would last
us until I could find something to do. But, without telling me what she
meant to do, mother took it all to the Casino--and--it followed the
rest.

"She was so horrified at what she had done, when it was too late, that
she wished to kill herself. It was a terrible time for me, but I was so
sorry--so sorry for her."

As the girl said this, she looked full into the young man's eyes, with
her great, appealing ones. He thought that she must have a wonderfully
sweet nature, to have forgiven that horrible, fat old woman, after being
subjected to so much undeserved suffering. It was a thousand pities, he
said to himself, that a really good sort of girl should be forced to
live her life beside a creature of that type, and under such an
influence. He had not quite believed in the poor child, at first,
perhaps, and because he did believe in her now, he felt poignant remorse
for his past injustice.

"What did you do, then?" he asked, honestly absorbed in the story, for
he was a generous and warm hearted fellow, who found most of his
pleasure, in these latter days, in the help he could give others, to
make them happier than he was himself.

"I comforted her as well as I could, but I didn't know what would become
of us. Then a lady, who had a room next to mine in the hotel, heard me
crying, and was very kind."

"I should think she would have been," interrupted the young man.

"She told me that, as my mother had lost everything, she had better go
to the Direction of the Casino, and get what they call a viatique--money
to go away with. So she did ask, though it was a great ordeal to make
up her mind to do it; and they gave my mother a thousand francs. Then,
you know, she had no right to play in the Rooms again; she was supposed
to pay her hotel bill, and leave Monte Carlo. But she gave half the
money to a woman she had met in the Rooms, and asked her to put it on
six numbers she had dreamed about; she was sure that this time she would
win."

"And did she?"

"No. The money was lost. We hadn't enough left to settle our account at
the hotel, or to get away from the place, even if there were anywhere to
go--when one has no pennies. So my mother begged me to slip into the
Rooms, with what was left, and try to get something back. I had been
trying when you saw me, with our last louis. Now you know why it seemed
so good to see a man I knew, a face I could trust. Now you know why I,
who had had such misfortunes, was glad at least to bring you luck."

"It's my turn to bring you some, I think," began the man she could
trust; but she stopped him by putting up her plump little white hand.

"If you mean with money, no," she said, with soft decision that was
pretty and sad to hear. "If you mean with advice, yes. If you could only
get me something to do! You see, they will be turning us out of our
hotel to-morrow. They've let us keep our rooms on, up to now, but for
two days they've not given us anything to eat. Of course, it can't go on
like this. If it hadn't been for you, I think when I went back to tell
my mother that the last louis of the viatique was gone, we would have
killed ourselves."

"Great Heaven, you must promise me not to do that," the young man
implored.

"I will promise, now, for you have saved me by--caring a little. You do
care, really, don't you?"

"I wouldn't have blood in my veins, if I didn't. But--about something
for you to do--I must think."

"Are you staying here for some time?" asked the girl.

"I haven't made up my mind."

"I asked because I--I suppose you don't need a secretary, do you? I can
write such a good English hand; and I know French and Italian as well as
I do German, and your own language. If I could be of use, I would work
so hard for you."

"I dare say I shall be needing a secretary after Christmas, indeed, I'm
sure I shall," insisted the young man, more and more earnest in his
desire to do good. "I have dozens of letters to write every day, and all
sorts of odds and ends to keep straight. I could bring the things down
to your place and you could help me, if you would. But I'm afraid it
would be no end of bother to you."

"I should love it," said the girl, gently.

"Oh, it would be hard work. It would take a lot of your time, and be
worth a lot of money."

"Would it really? But you mustn't overpay me. I should be so angry if
you did that."

"There's no danger. I'm a good business man, I assure you. I should pay
a capable secretary like you--knowing several languages and all
that--say forty dollars a week. That's about two hundred francs."

"Wouldn't that be too much?"

"Hardly enough."

"You are so good--so good! But I knew you would be. I wonder if you
would think me a very bold girl if I told you something? It's this; I've
never forgotten you since those days in Paris. You were different,
somehow, from other men I had seen. I thought about you. I had a
presentiment that we should meet again. My mother dreamed of numbers to
play at roulette. I dreamed of--but oh, I am saying things I ought not
to say! Please don't blame me. When you've starved for two days, and not
known what to do--unless to die, and then a man comes who is kind, and
saves you from terrible things, you can't be as wise and well behaved as
at other times."

"Poor child," said the young man.

"It does me good to be called that. But you don't know my name, the name
of your new secretary. It is Julie--Julie de Lavalette. My mother is
the Comtesse de Lavalette. And you?"

"Oh, I'm plain Hugh Egerton," said the young man.

The girl laughed. "I do not think you are plain Hugh Egerton at all. But
perhaps an American girl would not tell you that? Hugh! What a nice
name. I think it is going to be my favourite name."

She glanced up at him softly, under long lashes,--a thrilling glance;
but he missed its radiance, for his own eyes were far away. Hugh had
been the favourite name of another girl.

When she saw that look of his, she rose from her chair. "I'm taking too
much of your time," she exclaimed, remorsefully. "I must go."

His eyes and thoughts came back to the wearer of pink and roses.
Perhaps there had been just a little too much softness and sweetness. It
had been wise of her to change the key, and speak of parting.

He paid for the lunch, and tipped the waiters so liberally that they all
hoped he would come again often. Then he asked if he might walk with her
to the hotel where she and her mother were staying.

"It's down in the Condamine," she hesitated. "We've moved there lately,
since the money began to go, and we've had to think of everything. It's
rather a long walk from here."

"All the better for me," he answered, and her smile was an appreciation
of the compliment.

They sauntered slowly, for there was no haste. Nobody else wanted Hugh
Egerton's society, and he began to believe that this girl sincerely did
want it. He also believed that he was going to do some real good in the
world, not just in the ordinary, obvious way, by throwing about his
money, but by being genuinely necessary to someone.

When they had strolled down the hill, and had followed for a time the
straight road along the sea on that level plain which is the Condamine,
the girl turned up a side street. "We live here," she said, and stopped
before a structure of white stucco, rococco decoration, and flimsy
balconies. Large gold letters, one or two of which were missing,
advertised the house as the Hotel Pension Beau Soleil; and those who ran
might read that it would be charitable to describe its accommodation as
second rate.

"It is not nice," she went on, with a shrug of her pretty shoulders.
"But--it is good to know all the same that we will not be turned out. I
have a new heart in my breast, since I left this house a few hours
ago--because there is a You in the world."

As she said this, she held out her hand for goodbye, and when he had
shaken it warmly, the young man was bold enough to slip off her wrist
the little pink leather bag which hung there by its chain.

"Now for that advance on your secretarial work," he said; and taking
from his pocket a wad of notes which he had won at the Casino, he
stuffed it hastily into the yawning mouth of the bag, while the girl's
soft eyes gazed at the sea. Then he closed the spring with a snap, and
she let him pass the chain over her hand once more.

"Oh, but it looks very fat," she exclaimed. "Are you sure you counted
right?"

"There's a little more there," he said, uncomfortably, "just a little to
save the bother of counting here in the street. Don't look angry. Only
the salary part's for you, of course, but the rest--couldn't you just
hand it over to your mother, and say, 'Winnings at the Casino'? That's
true, you know; it was, every bit. And you needn't say who won it.
Besides, if it hadn't been for you, it would have been lost instead of
won. It would be a kind of Christmas present for your mother from the
Casino, which really owes her a lot more."

The girl shook her head, gently. "I couldn't do that, even for my
mother's sake; but I don't misunderstand, now we are such friends. I
know how kindly you mean, and though neither mother nor I can accept
presents of money, even from dear friends (after all we are of the
noblesse!) I'm not going to hurt you by giving the money back, if you
will do what I ask of you."

"What is that?" He felt ready to do anything within reason.

"Let us sell you our dear little dog, for this extra money you have put
into my bag. He is very, very valuable, for he cost thousands of francs,
the sweet pet, so you would really have something not unworthy, in
return for your goodness. Ah, don't say no. You would love Papillon, and
we should love you to have him. We couldn't have parted with our little
darling to a stranger, though we were starving; but it would make us
happy to think he was yours. And then, if you won't, you must take all
this back." As she spoke, she touched the bag on her arm.

"Oh, I'll have the dog!" Hugh Egerton said, quickly. Anything rather
than the girl should return the money, which she so much needed. "I
remember he was a dear little chap, Pomeranian or something of the sort.
I hope he likes motors."

"He will like whatever you like. If you will come and fetch him this
evening, I will show you all his tricks. Do come. It would be good to
see you again so soon."

"With pleasure," said the young man, flushing slightly. "If you think
your mother will be well enough to receive me?"

"The news I have to give will almost cure her. If you would dine with
us? They will give us a dinner, now"--and she laughed childishly--"when
I have paid the bill. It will be very stupid for you at a place like
this, but you will have a welcome, and it is the best we can do."

"It is the welcome I want," said Hugh. "But if you and your mother could
dine with me somewhere--"

"Another time we will."

There were to be other times, of course!

"And this evening," she went on, "we can talk of my beginning work, as
your secretary. It shall be directly after Christmas?"

"Whenever you are ready."

"I suppose you have friends to whom you will go for Christmas?"

"Not a friend."

"Oh, perhaps we might be together--all three?"

"I'll think of something pleasant for us to do, if you'll let me."

"How good you are! Then, till this evening. It will seem long till
then."

They shook hands once more. She had taken off her glove now, and her
palm left on his a reminiscence of Peau d'Espagne. He did not know what
the scent was, but it smelled rich and artificial, and he disliked to
associate it with his new friend. "But probably it's her mother's, and
she didn't choose it herself," he thought. "Well--I have a new interest
in life now. I expect this is the best thing that's happened to me for a
long time."

As he walked back to his hotel, his head was full of plans for the
girl's transient pleasure and lasting benefit. "Poor lonely child," he
thought. "And what a mother! She ought not to be left with a person like
that. She ought to marry. It would be a good deed to take her away from
such an influence. So young, and so ingenuous as she is still, in spite
of the surroundings she must have known, she is capable of becoming a
noble woman. Perhaps, if she turns out to be really as sweet and gentle
as she seems--"

The sentence broke off unfinished, in his mind, and ended with a great
sigh.

There could be only second best, and third best things in life for him
now, since love was over, and it would be impossible for him to care for
an angel from heaven, who had not the face and the dear ways of the girl
he had lost. But second best things might be better than no good things
at all, if only one made up one's mind to accept them thankfully. And it
was a shame to waste so much money on himself, when there were
soft-eyed, innocent girls in the world who ought to be sheltered and
protected from harm.




[Illustration: CHAPTER THREE]

WHEN THE CURTAIN WAS DOWN


[Illustration: T]

The soft-eyed, innocent girl who had inspired the thought went into the
hotel, and was rather cross to the youthful concierge, because the
_ascenseur_ was not working. There were three flights of stairs to mount
before she reached her room, and she was so anxious to open her bag to
see what was inside, that she ran up very fast, so fast that she stepped
on her dress and ripped out a long line of gathers. Her eyes were not
nearly as soft as they had been, while she picked up the hanging folds
of pink cloth, and went on.

The narrow corridor at the top of the staircase was somewhat dark, and,
her eyes accustomed to the brilliant light out of doors, the girl
stumbled against a child who was coming towards her.

"_Petit bête!_" she snapped. "You have all but made me fall. Awkward
little thing, why don't you keep out of people's way?"

The child flushed. She would have liked to answer that it was
Mademoiselle who had got in her way; but Mother wished her to be always
polite. "I am sorry," she replied instead, not saying a word about the
poor little toes which the pretty pink lady had crushed.

"Well, then, if you are sorry, why don't you let me pass?" asked the
girl of the soft eyes.

"If you please, I want to give you a note," said the child, anxiously
searching a small pocket. "It's from Mother, for Madame. She told me to
take it to your door; so I did, several times, but nobody answered. Here
'tis, please, Mademoiselle."

Mademoiselle snatched it from the hand, which was very tiny, and pink,
with dimples where grown up folk have knuckles. She then pushed past the
child, and went on to a door at the end of the passage, which she threw
open, without knocking.

"_Eh bien_, Julie! You have been gone long enough to break the bank
twice over. What luck have you had?" exclaimed the husky voice of a
woman who sat in an easy chair beside a wood fire, telling her own
fortune with an old pack of cards, spread upon a sewing board, on her
capacious lap.

She was in a soiled dressing gown of purple flannel, with several of the
buttons off. In the clear light of a window at the woman's back, her
hair, with a groundwork of crimson, was overshot with iridescent lights.
On a small table at her side a tray had been left, with the remains of
_déjeuner_; a jug stained brown with streaks of coffee; a crumbled
crescent roll; some balls of silver paper which had contained cream
chocolates; ends of cigarettes, and a scattered grey film of ashes. At
her feet a toy black Pomeranian lay coiled on the torn bodice of a red
dress; and all the room was in disorder, with an indiscriminate litter
of hats, gloves, French novels, feather boas, slippers, and fallen
blouses or skirts.

The lady of the roses went to the mirror over the untidy mantel piece,
and looked at herself, as she answered. "No luck at roulette or trente.
But the best of luck outside."

"What, then?"

The girl began to hum, as she powdered her nose with a white glove,
lying in a powder box.

"You remember _le beau brun_?"

"The young man in Paris you made so many enquiries about at Ritz's? Is
he here?"

"He is. I've just had lunch with him. Oh, there are lots of things to
tell. He is a good boy."

"How, good? You told him we had had losses?"

"I painted a sad picture. He was most sympathetic."

"To what extent?"

"_Chere maman!_ One would think we were vulgar adventuresses. We are
not. He respects me, this dear young man, and it is right that he
should. I deserve to be respected. You know the fable about the dog who
dropped his meat in the water, trying to snap at its reflection? Well,
I don't ask strangers for loans. I make my impression. Monsieur Hugh
Egerton is my friend--at present. Later, he will be what I choose. And
most certainly I shall choose him for a husband. What luck, meeting him
again! It is time I settled down."

"They said at Ritz's that he was one of the young millionaires, well
known already in America," the fat woman reflected aloud. "It is a good
thing that I have brought you up well, Julie, and that you are pretty."

"Yes, it is a good thing that I am pretty," repeated the girl. "We have
had many hopes often before, but this seems to be the most promising. I
think it is very promising indeed, and I don't mean to let it slip."

She turned her back to the easy chair, and opened the pink bag. As the
woman talked on, she secretly counted out the money. There were more
than ten thousand francs in mille notes and others of smaller
denominations. Quietly she put them away in the top of a travelling box,
which she locked. Then she noticed the letter which the child had given
her, still lying on the dressing table, with her gloves.

"Here's something from _la belle Americaine_, upstairs," said she. "A
_billet doux_."

"A dun," exclaimed the woman.

"No doubt. It can be nothing else."

"Well, we can't pay."

"No, we can't pay," said the girl, looking at the locked box.

"Let me see, how much was it she lent?"

"Two hundred francs, I think. We told her we'd give it back in a week.
That's nearly a month ago."

"Serve her right for trusting strangers. The saints alone know when
she'll see her money again. She shouldn't be so soft hearted. It
doesn't pay in these days."

"Neither do we--when we can help it."

They both laughed.

"But when you are Madame--let me see, what was the name of the young
monsieur, they told you at the Ritz?"

"Egerton."

"Ah yes. When you are Madame Egerton--"

"Everything will be very different then."

And the girl slipped the key of the box into the little pink bag.




[Illustration: CHAPTER FOUR]

DOGS AND FATHERS


[Illustration: A]

After delivering her letter, the child went slowly on downstairs, to the
room she had been on the way to visit. It was on the second floor, just
under the room of the Comtesse de Lavalette.

"Come in," said a Cockney voice shrill with youth, in answer to her tap;
and the child obeyed.

Though this room was of the same size and shape, it was very different
from that of the Comtesse. The plain furniture was stiffly arranged, and
there was no litter of clothing or small feminine belongings. By the
window, which gave a glimpse of the sea, and of Monaco rock with the old
part of the Palace, a plump young girl sat, with a baby a year or two
old in her arms, and a nurse's cap on her smooth head.

"You invited me to come down after I'd had my déjeûner, so I came," said
the child.

"Right you are, Miss Rosemary," returned the plump girl. "You're such a
quaint little body, you're a regular treat. I declare I ain't 'alf sure
I wouldn't rather talk to you, than read the Princess Novelettes.
Besides, I do get that tired of 'earin' nothin' but French, I'm most
sorry I undertook the job; and the Biby don't pick up English much yet."

"Don't you think he's a bright baby?" asked the child, sitting down on a
footstool, which was a favourite seat of hers.

"For a French biby, 'e 's as bright as you could expect," replied her
hostess, judicially.

"Are they different?"

"Well, they ain't Hinglish."

"_I'm_ half American," said the little girl.

"You don't talk through your nose. Far as I can see, you've got as good
a haccent as me."

"I suppose yours _is_ good?" asked Rosemary, as if she longed to have a
doubt set forever at rest.

"Rather! Ain't I been brought out from London on purpose so as this biby
can learn to speak Hinglish, instead of French? It's pretty near the
sime thing as bein' nursery governess. Madame wouldn't trust her own wye
of pronouncing the languidge. She must 'ave a Hinglish girl."

"And she sent for you on purpose?" the child enquired, with increasing
respect.

"Well, I was the only one as would come at the price. 'Tain't big wages;
but I'm seein' loife. Lor', I come down here with Madame and Mounseer a
fortnight ago, and Monte Carlo ain't got many secrets from me. I _was_ a
duffer, though, at first. When I 'eerd all them shots poppin' off every
few minutes, up by the Casino, I used to think 'twas the suicides a
shooting theirselves all over the place, for before I left 'ome, I 'ad a
warnin' from my young man that was the kind of goin's on they 'ad here.
But now I know it's only the pigeon shooters, tryin' for prizes, and I
wouldn't eat a pigeon pie in this 'otel, not if 'twas ever so!"

"Do they ever have them?" asked the little girl, awed.

"Not as I knows of, but they may for Christmas. I sye, are you lookin'
forward to your Christmas, kiddy?"

"Angel--that's Mother, I mean--says I'm not going to have much of a
Christmas this year. I'm trying not to mind. I suppose it's because
Santa Claus can't get to the Riviera, with his sleigh and reindeer. How
could he, Miss Jane, when there's no snow, and not even a scrap of ice?"

"Pshaw!" said Miss Jane. "It ain't Santa Claus brings you things, snow
or no snow. Only babies believe that. You're old enough to know better.
It's your father and mother does it all."

"Are you sure?" asked Rosemary.

"Dead sure. Don't be a silly and cry, now, just because there ain't any
Santa Claus, nor any fairies."

"It isn't that," said the little girl. "It's because I can never have
any more Christmases, if it depends on a father. You know, I haven't a
father."

"I supposed you 'adn't, as 'e ain't 'ere, with yer ma," replied the
young person. "She's mighty pretty."

"I think she's the prettiest mother in the world," said Rosemary,
proudly.

"She don't look much like a mother."

The child opened her eyes very wide at this new point of view. "I
couldn't have a mother who looked any other way," she said. "What do you
think she does look like?"

"Silly puss! I only mean she isn't much more'n a kid, 'erself."

"She's twenty five, twenty whole years more than me. Isn't that old?"

"Lawkes, no. I'm goin' on seventeen myself. I 'avent got any father, no
more'n you 'ave, so I can feel fur you. Your ma 'as to do typewritin'.
Mine does charrin'. It's much the sime thing."

"Is it?" asked Rosemary. "Angel doesn't like typewriting so very well.
It makes her shoulder ache, but it isn't that she minds. It's not having
enough work to do."

"Bless your hinnercent 'eart, charrin' mikes you ache all _over_!
Betcherlife my ma'd chinge with yours if she could."

"Would she? But Angel doesn't get on at all well here. I've heard her
telling a lady she lent some money to, and wanted to have it back, after
awhile. You see, when we were left poor, people said that she could make
lots of money in Paris, because they pay a good deal there for the
things Angel does; but others seemed to have got all the work for
themselves, before we went over to Paris to live, so some friends she
had told her it would be better to try here where there was no--no
com--com--"

"No compertishun," suggested the would-be nursery governess.

"Yes, that's the right word, I think. But there was some, after all.
Poor Angel's so sad. She doesn't quite know what we'll do next, for we
haven't much money left."

"She's got a job of char--I mean, typin' to-day anyhow," said Jane.

"Yes, she's gone to a hotel, where a gentleman talks a story out loud,
and she puts it down on paper. She's been three times; but it's so sad;
the story is a beautiful one, only she doesn't think he'll live to
finish it. He came here to get well, because there's sunshine, and
flowers; but his wife cried on Angel's shoulder, in the next room to
his, and said he would never, never get well any more. Angel didn't
tell me, for I don't think she likes me to know sad things; but I heard
her saying it all to a lady she works for sometimes, a lady who knows
the poor man. I don't remember his name, but he's what they call a
Genius."

"It's like that out here on the Riviera," said Jane, shaking her head so
gloomily that the ruffled cap wobbled. "Lots of ill people come, as well
as those who wants fun, and throwin' thur money about. In the midst of
loife we are in death. Drat the Biby, I believe 'e's swallowed 'is tin
soldier! No, 'ere it is, on the floor. But, as I was sayin', your ma and
mine might be sisters, in some wyes. Both of 'em lost their 'usbins,
young--"

"How did your father get lost?" Rosemary broke in, deeply interested.

"'E went to the dogs," replied Jane, mysteriously.

"Oh!" breathed the child, thrilled with a vague horror. She longed
intensely to know what had happened to her friend's parent after joining
his lot with that of the dogs, but was too delicate-minded to continue
her questioning, after such a tragic beginning. She wondered if there
were a kind of dreadful dog which made a specialty of eating fathers.
"And did he never come back again?" she ventured to enquire, at last.

"Not 'e. You never do, you know, if once you goes to the dogs. There
ain't no wye back. I was wonderin', since we've been acquainted, kiddy,
if your pa didn't go the sime road? It 'appens in all clarses."

"Oh no, my father was lost at sea, not on the road; and there aren't any
dogs there, at least I don't think so," said Rosemary.

"If it's only the sea 'as swallered 'im, 'e may be cast up again, any
day, alive an' bloomin'," replied Jane cheerfully. "My ma 'ad a grite
friend, sold winkles; 'er 'usbin was lost at sea for years and years,
till just wen she was comfortably settled with 'er second, along 'e
comes, as large as loife. Besides, I've read of such things in the
Princess Novelettes; only there it's most generally lovers, not 'usbins,
nor yet fathers. Would you know yours again, if you seen 'im?"

Rosemary shook her head doubtfully, and her falling hair of pale,
shimmering gold waved like a wheat-field shaken by a breeze. "Angel lost
him when I was only two," the child explained. "She's never talked much
to me about him; but we used to live in a big house in London--because
my father was English, you know, though Angel's American--and I had a
nurse who held me in her lap and told me things. I heard her say to one
of the servants once that my father had been lost on a yacht, and that
he was oh, ever such a handsome man. But--but she said--" Rosemary
faltered, her grey-blue eyes suddenly large and troubled.

"What was it she said?" prompted Jane, with so much sympathetic interest
that the little girl could not refuse to answer. Nevertheless, she felt
that it would not be right to finish her sentence.

"If you please, I'd rather not tell you what Nurse said," she pleaded.
"But anyway, I'd give everything I've got if my father would get found
again. You see, it isn't only not having proper Christmases any more,
that makes me feel sad, it's because Angel has to work so hard for me;
and if I had a father, I s'pose he'd do that."

"If 'e didn't he'd deserve to get What For," said Jane, decidedly. "If
you was a child in a story book, your pa'd come back and be lookin' for
you everywhere, on Christmas Eve; this Christmas Eve as ever was."

"Oh, would he?" cried Rosemary, a bright colour flaming on her little
soft cheeks.

"Yes; and what's more," went on her hostess, warming to the subject,
"you'd know 'im, the hinstant you clapped heyes on his fice, by
'eaven-sent hinstinct."

"What's 'eaven-sent hinstinct?" demanded Rosemary.

"The feelin' you 'ave in your 'eart for a father, wot's planted there by
Providence," explained Jane. "Now do you hunderstand? Because if you do,
I don't know but you'd better be trottin'. Biby's gorn to sleep, and
seems to be sleepin' light."

"Yes, I think I understand," Rosemary whispered, jumping up from her
footstool. "Goodbye. And thank you very much for letting me come and see
you and the baby."

She tiptoed across the room, her long hair waving and shimmering again,
softly opened, and shut the door behind her, and slowly mounted the
stairs to her own quarters, on the fourth floor.




[Illustration: CHAPTER FIVE]

ROSEMARY IN SEARCH OF A FATHER


[Illustration: S]

She had a doll and a picture book there, but she had looked at the
picture book hundreds of times; and though her doll was a faithful
friend, somehow they had nothing to say to each other now. Rosemary
flitted about like a will o' the wisp, and finally went to the window,
where she stood looking wistfully out.

Supposing that Jane were right, and her father came back out of the
ocean like the fathers of little girls in story books, this might be a
very likely place for him to land, because there was such lots of sea,
beautiful, sparkling, blue sea. Of course, he couldn't know that Angel
and she were in this town, because it was only about a month since they
came. It must be difficult to hear things in ships; and he might go
away, to look for them somewhere else, without ever finding them here.

Little thrills of excitement running from Rosemary's fingers to her toes
felt like vibrating wires. What could she do? Jane had said, if he came
at all, he was sure to come on Christmas Eve, according to the habit of
fathers, and it was Christmas Eve now. By and bye it would be too late,
anyhow for a whole year, which was just the same as forever and ever.
Oh, she must go out, this very minute!

The child had put on her hat and coat, before she remembered that Angel
had told her she must never stir beyond the hotel garden alone. But
then, Angel probably did not know this important fact about fathers lost
at sea, returning on Christmas Eve, and not at any other time.

If she waited until Angel came in, it might be after sunset, as it had
been yesterday; and then even if they hurried into the street to search,
they could not recognize him in the dark.

"I do think Angel would surely want me to go, if she knew," thought
Rosemary.

Her heart was beating fast, under the little dark blue coat. What a
glorious surprise for Angel, if she could bring a tall, handsome man
into this room, and say, "Dearest, now you won't have to work any more,
or cry in the night when you think I've gone to sleep. Here's father,
come back out of the sea."

"Oh, oh!" she cried, and ran from the room, afraid of wasting another
instant.

The sallow young concierge had often seen the child go out alone to
disappear round the path that circled the hotel, and play in the dusty
square of grass which, on the strength of two orange trees and a palm,
was called a garden. He thought nothing of it now, when she nodded in
her polite little way, and opened the door for herself. Five minutes
later, he was reading of a delicious jewel robbery, which had happened
in a tunnel near Nice, and had forgotten all about Rosemary's existence.

The little girl had an idea that she ought to go to the place where
ships came in, and as she had more than once walked to the port with her
mother, she knew the way very well.

Two white yachts were riding at anchor in the harbour, but no one had
come on shore who looked handsome enough for a father to be recognised
by 'eaven-sent-hinstinct, the moment you set eyes upon him. Rosemary
stood by the quay for a few minutes, uncertain what to do. Two or three
deep-eyed, long-lashed Monegasque men smiled at her kindly, as
Monegasque men and Italians smile at all children. She had learned to
lisp French with comparative fluency, during the months she and "Angel"
had spent in Paris; and now she asked where the people went who had come
in on those pretty white ships?

"Those are yachts," said one of the deep-eyed men; "and the people who
come on them are rowed to shore in little boats. Then they go quickly up
the hill, to the Casino--that big white building there--so that they can
put their money on a table, or take somebody else's money off."

"I have always seen dishes put on tables," said Rosemary, "never money.
If I went there, could I take some off? I should like to have a little,
very much."

"So would we all," smiled the deep-eyed man, patting her head. "They
would not let you in, because you are too young."

"I want to find my father, who has been on the sea," the child
explained. "Do you think he might be there?"

"He is sure to be there," said the deep-eyed man; and he and the other
men laughed. "If you sit on a bench where the grass and flowers are,
outside the Casino door, and watch, perhaps you will see him come down
the steps. But you are small to be out all alone looking for him."

"It's very important for me to find my father before it is dark," said
Rosemary. "So I thank you for telling me, and now goodbye."

Daintily polite as usual, she bowed to them all, and started up the
hill.

As she walked briskly on, she studied with large, starry eyes the face
of every man she met; but there was not a suitable father among them.
She was still fatherless when she reached the Place of the Casino, where
she had often come before, to walk in the gardens or on the terrace at
unfashionable hours with her mother, on Sundays, or other days
when--unfortunately--there was no work to do.

She had sat down on a bench between a French "nou-nou," with a wonderful
head dress, and a hawk-visaged old lady with a golden wig, and had fixed
her eyes upon the Casino door, when the throb, throb of a motor caught
her attention.

Now an automobile was a marvellous dragon for Rosemary, and she could
never see too many for her pleasure. Above all things, she would have
loved a spin on the back of such a dragon, and she liked choosing
favourites from among the dragon brood.

A splendid dark blue one was panting and quivering before the door of
the Hotel de Paris, having just been started by a slim chauffeur in a
short fur coat. As Rosemary gazed, deciding that this was the noblest
dragon of them all, a young man ran down the steps of the hotel and got
into the car. He took his place in the driver's seat, laid his hand on
the steering wheel as if he were caressing a baby's head, the chauffeur
sprang up beside his master, and they were off. But with a cry, Rosemary
rushed across the road.

The nou-nou shrieked and hugged her muffled charge; the old lady
screamed, and all the other old ladies and young ladies, and pretty
girls sitting on the benches, or walking about, screamed too.

The man who drove was pale under his coat of brown tan as with a crash
of machinery he brought the big blue car to a stop so close to the child
that its glittering bonnet touched her coat. He did not say a word for
an instant, for his lips were pressed so tightly together, that they
were a white line.

[Illustration: With a crash of machinery he brought the big blue car to
a stop.                                                       Page 70.

                                                          --_Rosemary._]

That beautiful, little golden-haired, smiling thing, so full of life!
But it was all right now. She was smiling still, as if she did not guess
the deadly peril she had just escaped.

"Don't you know, little one," he asked gently, "that it's very dangerous
to run in front of automobiles?"

"Oh, but I wanted so much to stop you," said Rosemary.

"Why, do you know me?" And the young man smiled such a pleasant smile,
with a gleam of white teeth, that the child was more than ever sure she
had done right.

"Yes, I know you by 'eavensenthinstinct." She got out the long word with
a gasp or two; but it was a great success. She had not mixed up a single
syllable.

The young man burst out laughing. "Where's your nurse?" he asked.

"In London," said Rosemary. "She isn't my nurse any more."

"Well, your mother--"

"She isn't--"

"What? Are you going to tell me she isn't your mother any more? Are you
out 'on your own,' little lady?"

"I don't know what that is; and my mother's my mother just as usual,
thank you," said Rosemary, with dignity. "She's quite well. But she
doesn't know I came out to look for you."

"Oh, doesn't she?" echoed the young man in the car. "Then don't you
think the best thing you can do is to let me take you back to her?"

"She won't be home yet, not till it's dark, I expect," said the child.

"Oh, that's a long time yet. Well, since you know me, wouldn't you like
to climb in, and have a little run?"

"May I, truly and really?" The little face grew pink with joy.

"Truly and really--if you're not afraid."

"What should I be afraid of?" Rosemary asked.

"I was talking nonsense. Get down, Paul, and put her into the tonneau.
You'd better sit by her, perhaps."

The chauffeur proceeded to obey, but when the child found herself being
tucked into a back seat of the car, she gave a little protesting cry.
"Oh, can't I sit in front with you?"

"Of course you can, if you like. Paul, wrap her up well in the rug. Now,
little one, we're going to start. I won't take you too fast."

He turned the car, and passing the Casino drove up the hill, taking the
direction of Mentone, when he had reached the top. He had not been over
this road before, as he had arrived by way of Nice yesterday; but he had
studied road maps, and knew both how and where he wished to go.

"Now," said he, driving carefully, "how do you like it?"

"Oh, it's wonderful!" answered Rosemary, with a rapt smile on her rosy
face.

"Have you ever motored before?"

She shook her head. "Never."

"Brave Baby."

"I don't usually care to be called a baby," she remarked. "But I don't
mind from you."

"I'm especially favoured, it seems," said the young man. "Tell me how
you happen to know me? I can't think, I must confess, unless it was on
shipboard--"

"There! I knew perfectly well it was you!" broke in Rosemary with a look
of rapture. "You _were_ on a ship, and you were lost at sea. But you're
found again now, because it's Christmas Eve."

"I wasn't lost at sea, though, or I shouldn't be here with you," said
Hugh Egerton. He glanced rather wistfully in a puzzled way at the
lovely little face framed with blowing golden hair. There was something
in the child's eyes which stabbed his heart; yet there was sweetness in
the pain. "I'm afraid we're playing at cross purposes, aren't we?" he
went on. "Was it on a ship that you saw me?"

"Oh, I didn't see you on the ship," said Rosemary. "I only knew you went
away on one. I haven't seen you for ever and ever so long, not since I
was a tiny baby."

"By Jove! And you've remembered me all this time?"

"Not exactly remembered. It was the feeling I had in my heart, just as
Jane said I would, the minute I saw you, that told me it was you. That
was why I ran to keep you from going on in your motor car, because if
you had, I might have lost you again, forever and ever."

"So you might," said puzzled Hugh Egerton, pleased as well as puzzled.
"And that would never have done for either of us."

"It would have been dreadful," replied Rosemary, "to have to wait for
another Christmas Eve."

"Christmas Eve seems a day for adventures," said Hugh. "One finds new
friends;--and dear little girls; and--goodness knows what I shall find
next."

"We must find Angel next," Rosemary assured him. "She'll be so glad to
see you."

"Do you really think so? By the way, who is Angel?"

"Mother. Didn't you know _that_?"

"I expect I'd forgotten," Hugh answered. She looked so reproachful, that
not for the world would he have denied all knowledge of Angel. The child
evidently took him for someone she had known; perhaps she had seen a
photograph of some long lost friend of her family, who resembled him,
and she had sprung to a conclusion, as children do. But she was an
exquisitely pretty and engaging little thing, a grand little pal, and
worth cultivating. Hugh liked children, especially girls, though he had
always been rather shy with them, not knowing exactly how they liked
best to be entertained, and finding it difficult to think of things to
say, in keeping up a conversation. But there was no such difficulty with
this child. It was really interesting to draw the little creature out,
and see what she would say next. As for finding Angel, however, when the
time came to do that, he thought he would prefer to bid Angel's daughter
goodbye at the door. He had no fancy for scraping up an acquaintance
with strangers through their children.




[Illustration: CHAPTER SIX]

FAIRY FATHERS MUST VANISH


[Illustration: R]

Rosemary sat in silence for a few moments, taking in the full meaning of
her companion's answer to her last question. He had forgotten that Angel
was Angel! Though she was warmly wrapped in a soft rug of silvery fur, a
chill crept into her heart. Could it be that Nurse's words about father
had been true, after all; and if they were, was she doing harm, rather
than good, in bringing him home?

Presently Hugh waked out of his own thoughts, and noticed the little
girl's silence.

"You're not afraid?" he asked, blissfully unconscious of offence. "I'm
not driving too fast to please you?"

"Oh no," said Rosemary.

"You're not cold?"

"No, thank you."

"Nor tired?"

"No, not tired."

"But something is the matter?"

"I'm worrying," confessed the child.

"What about, little one?"

"I'm not sure if I ought to have spoken to you, or have come with you,
after all."

To save his life, Hugh could not have helped laughing, though it was
evidently a matter of serious importance. "What, do you think we ought
to have a chaperon?" he asked. "Paul's in the tonneau, you know; and
he's a most discreet chap."

"I don't know what a chaperon is," said Rosemary. "But will you promise
not to be angry if I ask you something, and will you promise to answer,
honour bright?"

"Yes, to both your questions."

"Were you really unkind to Angel, before you were lost?"

This was a hard nut to crack, if his past were not to be ruthlessly
severed from Angel's by a word. He thought for a moment, and then said,
"Honour bright, I can't remember anything unkind I ever did to her."

"Oh, I'm so glad. I was afraid, when you said you'd forgotten--but maybe
her name wasn't Angel, then?"

"That was it, I'm sure," replied Hugh, soothingly. "Maybe you named her
Angel, yourself?"

"I don't know," said Rosemary. "She seems to have been it, always, ever
since I can remember. And she does look just like one, you know, she's
so beautiful."

"I expect you remember a lot more about angels than I do, because it
isn't so long since you came from where they live. But here we are in
the woods at Cap Martin. Have you ever been here before?"

"Angel and I had a picnic here once, all by ourselves; and there were
lots of sheep under the olive trees, and a funny old shepherd who made
music to them. Oh, I do love picnics, don't you? Angel said, if she were
rich, she'd take me on the loveliest kind of a picnic for Christmas;
but, you see, it would cost too much money to do it, for we've hardly
got any, especially since the Comtesse doesn't pay us back."

"What kind of picnic would it have been?" asked Hugh, driving along the
beautiful shore road, where the wind-blown pines lean forward like
transformed wood nymphs, caught in a spell just as they spread out their
arms to spring into the sea.

"Angel has told me lots of history-stories about the strange
rock-villages in the mountains. There's one called Éze, on top of a hill
shaped almost like a horn; she showed me a picture of it. Children live
up in the rock villages, and never come down to the towns. They've never
even seen any toys, like other children play with, Angel says. All the
strangers who come here give presents to the poor in Monte Carlo and
Mentone, and big places like that; but they never think of the ones up
in the mountains. Angel said how nice it would be, if we were rich, to
buy toys,--baskets and baskets full,--and give them away to the
children of Éze. Perhaps you are rich; are you?"

"Richer than I thought, a few years ago, that I ever should be. I used
to be poor, until I dug, and found some gold lying about in the ground."

"How splendid! I suppose the fairies showed you where to look. Jane says
there are no fairies, but I do hope she's mistaken. I wish you would
send up some presents to the little children at Éze."

"I will, lots, if you'll take them."

"Perhaps we could all go together."

"I'm afraid your mother wouldn't care for that."

"Yes, she would. Because, if you were never unkind to her, like Nurse
said you were, she'll be most awfully glad to see you again. I shouldn't
wonder if she'd cry for joy, to have you with us always, and take care
of us. Oh, do let's go back now, and I'll take you to her. She _will_ be
surprised!"

"I should think she would," said Hugh. "But look here; you said she
wouldn't get back till dark. We've come to Mentone now. See how pretty
the shops are for Christmas. Can't you stop and have some nice hot
chocolate and cakes with me, and afterwards choose a doll for yourself,
as a Christmas present from your old friend?"

As he put this temptation before her, he slowed down the car in front of
a shop with big glass windows full of sparkling cakes, and ribbon-tied
baskets of crystallized fruits. Through the windows Rosemary could see a
great many well-dressed people sitting at little marble tables, and it
would have been delightful to go in. But she shook her head. The sun
was setting over the sea. The sky was flooded with pink and gold, while
all the air was rosy with a wonderful glow which painted the mountains,
even the dappled-grey plane trees, and the fronts of the gaily decorated
shops.

The donkey women were leading their patient little animals away from the
stand on the sea promenade, up to Sorbio for the night; and their dark
faces under the queer, mushroom hats were ruddy and beautiful in the
rose-light.

"As soon as the sun goes down, it gets dark here," said Rosemary,
regretfully. "Thank you very much, but I'd rather go home now. You see,
I do _so_ want you to be there already, waiting to surprise Angel when
she comes in."

"No time even to buy a doll?"

"I'd rather go home, thank you. Besides, though I should like to have a
new doll, perhaps darling Evie would be sad if I played with another."

Hugh was obediently turning the car's bonnet towards Monte Carlo, and
for the fraction of a second he was foolish enough almost to lose
control of it, on account of a start he gave. "Evie!" he echoed.

It was years since he had spoken that name.

"She's my doll," explained Rosemary.

"Oh!" said Hugh.

"But I don't think she'd mind or be sad if you gave me a doll's house,"
went on the child, "if you _should_ have time to get it for me by and
bye; that is, if you really want to give me something for Christmas, you
know."

"Of course I do. But tell me, why did you name your doll Evie?"

He put the question in a low voice, as if he were half ashamed of asking
it; and as at that instant a tram boomed by, Rosemary heard only the
first words.

"I 'sposed you would," she replied. "Fathers do like to give their
little girls Christmas presents, Jane says; maybe that's why they're
obliged to come back always on Christmas Eve, if they've been lost. Do
you know, even if there aren't any fairies, it's just like a fairy story
having my father come back, and take me to Angel in a motor car on
Christmas eve."

"Good gracious!" exclaimed Hugh Egerton. "Did you say--father?"

"Yes," replied Rosemary. "You're almost like a fairy father, I said."

So, he was her father--her long lost father! Poor little lamb, he began
to guess at the story now. There was a scamp of a father who had "not
been very kind" to Angel, and had been lost, or had thoughtfully lost
himself. For some extraordinary reason the child imagined that he--well,
if it were not pathetic, it would be funny. But somehow he did not feel
much inclined to laugh. Poor little thing! His heart yearned over her;
but the situation was becoming strained. Unless he could think of some
good way out of it, he might have a scene when he was obliged to rob the
child of her father, on reaching the door of her house.

"That's it," said he, calling all his tact to the rescue. "I am a fairy
father. Just as you thought, it's a mistake of Jane's about there being
no fairies; only the trouble is, fairies aren't so powerful as they used
to be in the old days. Now, I should love to be able to stay with you
for a long, long time, but because I'm only a poor fairy father, I
can't. We've been very happy together, and I'm tremendously glad you
found me. I shall think of you and of this day, often. But the cruel
part is, that when I bring you to your door, I'm afraid I shall have
to--vanish."

"Oh, how dreadful!" cried Rosemary, her voice quivering. "Must I lose
you again?"

"Perhaps I can write to you," Hugh tried to console her, feeling
horribly guilty and helpless.

"That won't be the same. I do love you so much. _Please_ don't vanish."

"I shall send you things. A doll's house for Evie. By the way, you
didn't tell me why you named her that."

"After Angel, of course," returned the child absent-mindedly. "But when
you've vanished, I--"

"Is your mother's name Evie?"

"Evelyn. But that's too long for a doll."

"Evelyn--what? You--you haven't told me your name yet."

"Rosemary Evelyn Clifford."

"Great Heavens!"

"How strange your voice sounds," said Rosemary. "Are you ill?"

"No--no! I--feel a little odd, that's all."

"Oh, it isn't the vanishing coming on already? We're a long way from our
hotel yet."

Hugh drove mechanically, though sky and sea and mountains seemed to be
seething together, as if in the convulsions of an earthquake.

Her child! And her husband--what of him? The little one said he was
lost; that he had not been kind. Hugh gritted his teeth together, and
heard only the singing of his blood in his ears. Was the man dead, or
had he but disappeared? In any case, _she_ was here, alone in Monte
Carlo, with her child; poor, unhappy, working by day, crying by night.
He must see her, at once--at once.

Yet--what if it were not she, after all? If the name were a coincidence?
There might be other Evelyn Cliffords in the world. It must be that this
was another. His Evelyn had married a rich and titled Englishman. She
was Lady Clifford. The things that had happened to Rosemary's Angel
could not have happened to her. Still, he must know, and know quickly.

"Where do you live, little Rosemary?" he asked, grimly schooling his
voice, when he felt that he could trust himself to speak.

"The Hotel Pensior Beau Soleil, Rue Girasole, in the Condamine, Monte
Carlo," answered the child, as if she were repeating a lesson she had
been taught to rattle off by heart.

Lost as he was to most external things, Hugh roused himself to some
surprise at the name of the hotel.

"Why, that is where Mademoiselle de Lavalette and her mother live!" he
exclaimed.

"They're the ladies Angel lent the money to, because she was so sorry
for them," said Rosemary. "I've heard them talking about it with her,
and saying they can't pay it back. They're angry with her for asking,
but she had to, you see. When they go past us in the dining-room they
turn their backs."

Hugh's attention was arrested now.

"Do they dine?" he asked. "Every night?"

"Oh yes, always. Mademoiselle has lovely dresses. She is pretty, but the
Comtesse is such an ugly old lady; like Red Riding Hood's grandmother, I
think. I'm afraid of her. Jane says _her_ Madame and Monsieur don't
believe she's really a Comtesse. I had to knock at her door with a
letter from Angel to-day, for Angel doesn't know I'm afraid. I couldn't
help being glad Madame wouldn't let me in, for it seemed as if she might
eat me up. I knocked and knocked, and when I was going away, I saw
Mademoiselle coming in, in a pink dress with a rosy hat."

"I think she'll pay your mother back to-morrow," said Hugh, remembering
the fatness of the pink bag.

"She didn't say she would. She was so cross with me that she called me a
_petit bête_, and snatched the letter out of my hand."

At this, Hugh's face grew suddenly hot and red, and he muttered
something under his breath. But it was not a word which Rosemary would
have understood, even if she had heard.




[Illustration: CHAPTER SEVEN]

THE WHITE FIGURE AT THE DOOR


[Illustration: R]

Rosemary had tears in her eyes and voice, when the fairy father stopped
his car at the door of the hotel. He had driven so very quickly since
he'd broken it to her that they must part!

"Now, have you to vanish this very minute?" she asked, choking back a
sob, as he lifted her to the ground.

Vanish? He had forgotten all about vanishing. To vanish now was the last
thing he wished to do.

"Something tells me that I shan't have to,--quite yet, anyhow," he said
hastily. "I--want to see your mother. Has she a sitting-room where I
could call upon her, or wait till she comes in?"

"We haven't one of our own," said Rosemary. "But there's a nice old lady
who lives next door to us, on the top floor, and is very good to Angel
and me. She writes stories, and things for the papers, and Angel types
them, sometimes. When she's away she lets us use the sitting-room where
she writes; and she's away now. Angel and I are going to be there this
evening till it's my bed-time; and you can come up with me if you will.
Oh, I'm so thankful you don't need to vanish for a little while."

His heart pounding as it had not pounded for six years and more--(not
since the days when he had gone up other stairs, in another land, to
see an Evelyn)--Hugh followed the flitting figure of the child.

The stairs and corridors were not lighted yet. One economises with
electric light and many other little things at a hotel pension, where
the prices are "from five francs a day, _vin compris_."

Rosemary opened a door on the fourth floor, and for a moment the
twilight on the other side was shot for Hugh with red and purple spots.
But the colours faded when the childish voice said, "Angel isn't here.
If you'll come in, I'll go and see if she's in our room."

"Don't tell her--don't say--anything about a fairy father," he
stammered.

"Oh no, that's to be the surprise," Rosemary reassured him, as she
pattered away.

It was deep twilight in the room, and rather cold, for the eucalyptus
and olive logs in the fireplace still awaited the match. Hugh could see
the blurred outlines of a few pieces of cheap furniture; a sofa, three
or four chairs, a table, and a clumsy writing desk. But the window was
still a square of pale bluish light, cut out of the violet dusk, and as
the young man's eyes accustomed themselves to the dimness, the room did
not seem dark.

He was not left alone for long. In two or three minutes Rosemary
appeared once more, without her hat and coat, to say that "Angel" had
not yet come back. "But she'll soon be here now," went on the child.
"Do you mind waiting in the twilight, fairy father? The electric light
doesn't come on till after five, and I've just heard the clock
downstairs strike five."

"I shall like it," answered Hugh, glad that his face should be hidden by
the dusk, in these moments of waiting.

"Angel tells me stories in the twilight," said Rosemary, as he sat down
on the sofa by the cold fireplace, and she let him lift her light little
body to his knee. "Would you tell me one, about when you were lost?"

"I'll try," Hugh said. "Let me think, what story shall I tell?"

"I won't speak while you're remembering," Rosemary promised, leaning her
head confidingly against his shoulder. "I always keep quiet, while Angel
puts on her thinking cap."

Hugh laughed, and was silent. But his head was too hot to wear a
thinking cap, and no story would come at his half-hearted call.

Rosemary waited in patience for him to begin. "One, two, three," she
counted under her breath; for she had learned to count up to fifty, and
it was good practice when one wished to make the time pass. She had
just come to forty-nine, and was wondering if she might remind the fairy
father of his duty, when the door opened.

It was Angel, of course; but Angel did not come in. She stopped on the
threshold, talking to somebody, or rather somebody was talking to her.
Rosemary could not see the person, but she recognised the voice. It was
that of Mademoiselle de Lavalette.

"You are not to write my mother letters, and trouble us about that
money, madame," said the voice, as shrill now as it could be sweet.
"Once for all, I will not have it. I have followed you to tell you this.
You will be paid soon; that is enough. I am engaged to be married to a
rich man, an American. He will be glad to pay all our debts by and by;
but meantime, madame, you are to let us alone."

"I have done nothing, except to write and say that I needed the
money,--which you promised to return weeks ago, or I couldn't possibly
have spared it," protested a voice which Hugh had heard in dreams three
nights out of every six, in as many years.

"Well, if you write any more letters, we shall burn them unread, so it
is no use to trouble us; and we will pay when we choose."

With the last words, the other voice died into distance. Mademoiselle
had said what she came to say, and was retreating with dignity down the
corridor.

Now the figure of a slender woman was silhouetted in the doorway. Hugh
heard a sigh, and saw a hand that glimmered white in the dusk against
the dark paper on the wall, as it groped for the button of the electric
light. Then, suddenly the room was filled with a white radiance, and
she stood in the midst of it, young and beautiful, the woman he had
loved for seven years.

Putting Rosemary away he sprang up, and her eyes, dazzled at first by
the sudden flood of light, opened wide in startled recognition.
"Hugh--Hugh Egerton!" she stammered, whispering as one whispers in a
dream.

She was pale as a lily, but the whiteness of her face was like light,
shining from within; and there was a light in her great eyes, too, such
as had never shone for Hugh on sea or land. Once, a long time ago, he
had hoped that she cared, or would come to care. But she had chosen
another man, and Hugh had gone away; that had been the end. Yet
now--what stars her eyes were! One might almost think that she had not
forgotten; that sometimes she had wished for him, that she was glad to
see him now.

"Lady Clifford," he stammered. "I--will you forgive my being here--my
frightening you like this?"

The brightness died out of her face. "Lady Clifford!" she echoed. "Don't
call me that, unless--I'm to call you Mr. Egerton? And besides, I'm only
Madame Clifford here. It is better; the other would seem like
ostentation in a woman who works."

"Evelyn," he said. "Thank you for letting it be Evelyn." Then, his voice
breaking a little, "Oh, say you're a tiny bit glad to see me, just a
tiny bit glad."

She did not answer in words; but her eyes spoke, as she held out both
hands.


[Illustration: He crushed them in his, then bent his head and kissed
them.                                                        Page 102.

                                                          --_Rosemary._]

He crushed them in his, then bent his head and kissed them; first the
girlish right hand, then the left. But she saw his face contract as
he caught the gleam of her wedding ring. As he looked up, their eyes met
again, and each knew what was in the other's mind.

"Angel, dearest," said Rosemary, "do tell the fairy father you're glad
to see him."

Evelyn started. "Why do you call him that?"

"Because he said he was a fairy, and would have to vanish soon. But
you'll beg him not to, won't you?"

"I--I should be sorry to lose him again. We haven't many friends, in
these days." The bright head was bowed over the child's, as Rosemary
clung to her mother's dress.

"You never lost me," said Hugh Egerton. "It was I who lost you. Evie,
you don't know what black years these have been. I loved you so."

"But that--was--long ago."

"It was always."

"Hugh! I thought you must have learned to hate me."

"Hate you, because I couldn't make you care for me as--I hoped you
would, and because you cared for someone else? No, I--"

"But--I did care for you. It was for my father's sake that--that--ah, I
can't talk of it, Hugh. You know, we were so poor after father lost his
money, I tried with all my heart to forget, and to do my best for--my
husband. Perhaps it was my punishment that he--oh, Hugh, I was so
miserable. And then--then he went away. He was tired of me. He was on a
yacht, and there was a great storm. But you must have read in the
papers--"

"Never. I never knew till this day."

"It was more than three years ago."

Hugh was very pale. Three years ago--three long years in which he had
worked, and tried not to think of her! And if he had known--"You see,
I've had a queer life, knocking about in strange places," he said,
trying to speak calmly. "Often I didn't see any newspapers for weeks
together. I thought of you always as rich and happy, living in England,
the wife of Sir Edward Clifford--"

"Rich and happy," she repeated, bitterly. "How little one knows of
another's life. After his death, there was nothing--there had been some
wild speculations; and the estates went with the title, of course, to
his cousin. But, yes,--in a way you were right. I was rich and happy
because I had Rosemary."

"And Rosemary had you, Angel," cried the child, who had been listening,
puzzled and bewildered, not knowing that they had forgotten her
presence until this moment. "Rosemary had you. And now we've all got
each other--till the fairy father vanishes."

"But I shan't have to vanish after all," said Hugh.

       *       *       *       *       *

After that, it seemed they had been together but for a moment, when a
wild wail went moaning through the house; the first gong for the
_pensionnaires'_ dinner.

So loud it was that it hushed their voices for a long minute. And when
cool silence came again, Hugh begged that the two would have their
Christmas Eve dinner with him, at his hotel. "There's so much to plan
for to-morrow, and all the days," he pleaded. "And just for once
Rosemary shall have a late dinner like the grown-ups. Do say yes."

So Evelyn said yes. And it was not until they were all three seated in
the restaurant of the Hotel de Paris, that he remembered he had been
engaged to dine at the Beau Soleil with Mademoiselle and the Comtesse,
her mother.

But he did not even blush because he had forgotten.




[Illustration: CHAPTER EIGHT]

WHEN A MAN GOES SHOPPING


[Illustration: W]

Many of Hugh Egerton's best moments during the last six years had been
spent in dreams. In those dreams the past had lived again; for he had
seen the future as once he had hoped it might be for him.

But all through this night of Christmas Eve he lay awake; and no dreams
had ever been as half as sweet as the thoughts that came to him then. It
would have been a hideous waste of time to sleep, when he could lie
there and live over again each moment of his evening, beginning at the
beginning, when She had come into the room, and going on to the end
when he had brought her and Rosemary to the door of the Hotel Pension
Beau Soleil, to say "goodbye until to-morrow." When he came to the end,
he went back to the beginning again with renewed zest, trying to call up
some word, some look of hers which he might have neglected to count
among his treasured jewels.

Then, when he was sure that he had each pearl and ruby and diamond duly
polished and strung on the fine gold chain of loving memory, he would
let his mind run ahead of time, to the next day.

What a Christmas it was going to be! There never had been one like it
before, in the history of the world; but--the best of it was--there was
reason to hope that there would be many others to come just as
exquisite, if not more perfect.

Evelyn Clifford had loved him, even when she had let him go. She loved
him now; and she had promised to make up for the long grey years of the
past by marrying him almost at once.

There was nothing to wait for. He was lonely and rich. She was lonely
and poor. Both were young, and starving for happiness. In a week they
would be married, for she had promised to begin the New Year as his
wife. Meanwhile, there would be a great deal to do (so she said, though
he could not see why) in getting ready. But Christmas was to be a
holiday. They were going on that picnic to Éze, all three. That was
already planned; but Hugh had mentally made an addition to the plan, of
which he had said not a word.

He was as excited over the thought of this plan as Rosemary would have
been had she known. And lest there should be a hitch, or he should not
have time to accomplish all, he was out of bed by half past six--that
mysterious hour of dawn when across the glimmering sea Corsica can be
seen, floating like a heaped basket of violets in waves of transparent
gold.

Last night he had anxiously enquired of the concierge whether the Monte
Carlo shops would be open on Christmas morning, and had been informed
that they would. Otherwise, Hugh Egerton would have been capable of
battering down the doors, helping himself to the things he wanted, and
leaving enough money to pay for damages as well as purchases.

After all, he was ready long before the shutters of those attractive
plate glass windows were taken away; but he was not sorry for that. He
had the joy of walking down to the Condamine and gazing up at other
windows far more attractive, and saying to the closed green blinds,
"Merry Christmas, merry Christmas, my darling--mine for always, now!"

Then he darted back to rolls and coffee; beamed on the waiters, gave
them fat five franc pieces merely for beaming in return; and arrived in
the Galerie Charles Trois just as the shop windows were opening radiant
Christmas eyes.

The first visit he paid was to the florist's; and to save time in
choosing he simply said, "I'll take all those things you have in the
window, please."

There were about two hundred francs worth of roses, the same of white
lilacs, and enough lilies of the valley, nestling in baby leaves of
yellow green, to clean out any save a well-filled pocket book; but that
was all the better. The more he could spend to-day, the more was Hugh
Egerton pleased. He gave "Madame Clifford's" address, and wrote
something in English on his visiting card. The flowers were to go at
once; at once, mind; not in fifteen minutes, but now, this very now.

"How much in love is that handsome young Monsieur!" thought the
Mademoiselle of the shop, with a little sigh for some of the wonders of
the world which she had missed, and must always miss. Her heels were
appallingly high, and her waist was incredibly small; but she had a
heart; and there was no heart which would not have softened to Hugh, and
wished him the best of good luck, this day.

The next window which attracted the young man's eye, was one which
displayed just such a dress as he had vaguely pictured yesterday, for a
dear companion on the terrace. It was white, of course; and he was not
sure, but he thought it was made of cloth. Anyway there was a lot of
embroidery on it, full of little holes, which somehow contrived to be
extraordinarily fetching. It had a mantle which hung in soft folds,
marvellously intricate, yet simple in effect; and he could have fallen
upon the neck of the stout, powdered lady in black silk who assured him
that the costume could be worn without alteration by any "_dame de jolie
taille_."

He bought it instantly, and then seized upon precisely such a "long
white thing" of ermine as he had seen in his mind's eye. A "granny" muff
went with it. (Really the people of the shop must have had prophetic
souls!) And there was a white hat, with a gold buckle and a long white
ostrich feather which looked as if it had been born to shade the face of
Evelyn Clifford.

When these "confections" had been secured, Madame of the black satin and
powdered nose assured Monsieur that his Christmas purchases would be
incomplete without a certain blouse which, to an untutored eye, appeared
to be a combination of sea-foam and rose-leaves. There was a belt, too,
crusted with seed pearls; and a hanging bag to match. Oh, certainly
Monsieur would take these, and anything else which Madame could
conscientiously recommend. She could, and did, recommend several other
things; and no doubt it was a mere coincidence that they happened to be
among the most expensive in the shop. She also won Hugh's gratitude by
being able to produce a coat and a frock in which a little girl of five,
already beautiful, would be more akin to fairyhood than ordinary
childhood, and might become the "exception that would prove the rule" to
an unbelieving Jane.

The cloak was pale blue; and another shop had to be searched for a hat
to be worn with it, but Madame was most kind in directing Monsieur where
to find one. Her sister would serve him, therefore he would be well
served.

On the way, he passed a jeweller's; and exactly the right string of
pearls, and the right "swallow brooch" stared him in the face, in the
window. It was odd, how all the prettiest things in the world, of
whatever description, looked as if they ought to belong to Evelyn and
Rosemary Clifford. There was a gold bag, too; but that was a detail, for
really the principal thing he had called for was a ring with a single
diamond in it--and perhaps--well, yes--that little sapphire band to keep
it on a slender finger.

The rings, in their delicate cases, he put into his pocket when he had
paid; but the other purchases were to go in that very same now which had
been impressed upon the florist; the sort of now to which Riviera
shopkeepers are accustomed only when they deal with Americans.

Then Madame's sister was found, and a blue hat; and there was just time
left for a frantic rush to a toyshop, round a corner and up a hill.
Perhaps Doll Evie might be jealous of one rival, but there's safety in
numbers; and Hugh thought that a dozen assorted sizes, from life-size
down, would keep a doll's house from echoing with loneliness. As for the
presents for the Éze children, Rosemary was to choose them herself by
and by; but all these special things were to be served up, so to speak,
at the Hotel Pension Beau Soleil with early breakfast.

When he had finished,--which means, when he had bought everything he
could think of--Hugh looked at his watch. It was half an hour to the
minute since he had left his hotel.

"I don't see why it should take women a long time to shop," said he to
himself. "It seems to me the simplest thing in the world. You just see
what you want, and then you buy it."

It was not until all the boxes and parcels must have arrived in the
Condamine, that an agonizing thought struck Hugh. What if Evie should be
offended with him for buying her things to wear? What if she should
imagine him capable of thinking that the things she already had were not
good enough when she was coming out with him?

He suddenly felt a hundred years old. "Ass--worm--menagerie!" he
anathematized himself.

It was now nine thirty. At ten forty-five he was to call at the Hotel
Pension Beau Soleil, to take Evelyn and Rosemary to the English church.
How could he bear the suspense till then,--how endure it not to know
whether he had ruined the Christmas which was to have been so perfect?

He dashed into his own hotel, wrote five notes one after the other,
tearing up each one before it was finished. It was no good explaining.
If she didn't understand nothing would make her. But _would_ she
understand? He knew now why some women said that all men were fools.
They were quite right.

If he had dared, he would have gone to her at once, to be put out of
his misery, one way or the other. But he did not dare; so he waited,
until he had persuaded himself that not only his watch, but the hotel
clock and the Casino clock must be slow.

Then he started, and suffered five suffocating minutes in the public
sitting-room of the Beau Soleil. It was a hideous room, with abominable
flowers sprawling over the wall paper and carpet, and all the windows
were shut, but he did not notice these things; nor did he recognise the
heavy scent that hung in the air as that which Mademoiselle de Lavalette
affected. The lady of the roses had ceased to exist for him; but, if he
had thought of her at all, he would have been glad that he had opened
her pink leather bag when it was thin, and shut it up when it was very
fat.

At the end of the five minutes, the door opened, and gave to his eyes a
vision; Evelyn and Rosemary in their new dresses and new hats.

It was all he could do to keep from crying "Thank Heaven," and to say a
mere "Merry Christmas" instead.

"Wicked, extravagant Boy," exclaimed Evelyn. "Do you know, we are most
unsuitably dressed? But we _had_ to put the things on, hadn't we? It was
wrong of you to buy them, but--don't look so terrified--it was sweet,
too; and I know just the feeling that prompted you to do it. What a
dream-Christmas this is going to be."

And then she and Rosemary thanked him separately, for each individual
thing he had given. It took some time, and they were nearly late for
Church, but not quite.

If Mademoiselle de Lavalette had been looking out of her window at a
certain moment she would have been exceedingly surprised, not only by
the transformation of Madame Clifford and _la petite bête_ from church
mice into visions, but still more by the sight of their companion.

But hot rage and cold disappointment had given her a bad night.

She had expected a guest for dinner. She had put on her prettiest frock,
and had forbidden her mother the Comtesse to paint. She had ordered
champagne, an extra entrée, and a bunch of flowers for the table. Yet
the guest had neither come nor sent an excuse. She had stopped in the
house all the evening, thinking that he might have been detained by an
accident to his automobile; but the hours had dragged on emptily.
Nothing happened except a bad headache, and a quarrel with her mother,
who was ungratefully inclined to be sarcastic at her expense.

Half the night Mademoiselle had lain awake, wondering why the bird had
not come hopping into the trap; and through the other half she had
wondered anxiously if the bird would come to-morrow, with excuses which
she might graciously accept. At last she had fallen asleep and dreamed
ecstatic dreams about diamond necklaces and thousand franc notes. When
the procession of three left the Beau Soliel on its way to the English
Church, strings of diamonds were still being drawn through
Mademoiselle's head, charming though wreathed with patent curling pins.

It was half past eleven when she was waked by the Comtesse ringing for
_petits pains_ and chocolate. A toilette was hastily made, without too
much time being wasted on water; and Mademoiselle,--all in black and
white this morning, like a _jeune fille_ in second mourning,--hurried
out to walk on the terrace at the fashionable hour. If she did not find
the truant there, she said to herself, she would go into the Casino; for
he was sure to be in one place or the other at this time of day, even
though it was Christmas.

She walked a little, but not much; for her high-heeled shoes were tight,
and made her feel even more annoyed with the world and everyone in
it--except herself--than she had been before she started. Presently she
sat down on one of the green benches, and arranged a "peace on earth,
goodwill to men" expression which pinched her lips almost as painfully
as her shoes pinched her toes. She wore it unremittingly, nevertheless,
even though many of the women who passed her, walking on the terrace,
were prettier and younger and better dressed than she, and--more
grievous still--were accompanied by agreeable looking men, while she sat
alone scarcely glanced at by the promenaders.

She had just begun to think that she had better try the Casino, when
down the steps from the upper terrace came three figures. There was
something familiar about them all, but to see them together made them
more than strange. Besides, the two she knew best were strange in
another way. Their habit was to be shabby, though neat; now, there was
no one on the terrace as beautifully dressed as this tall young woman
and the slim little girl. No, it couldn't be Madame Clifford and her
_petit choux_; and yet--and yet--as they came nearer, near enough for
Mademoiselle to recognise the man with them, she felt a horrid sensation
as if something which she called her heart were dropping out of her
bosom from sheer heaviness, leaving a vacuum.

[Illustration: They came nearer, near enough for Mademoiselle to
recognize the man with them.                                  Page 124.

                                                          --_Rosemary._]

Hardly knowing what she did, she sprang up from her bench while they
were still far off, and began walking towards them. There was a queer,
singing noise in her head, and a feeling as if the skin were too tightly
stretched across her forehead. Still, she smiled, and winked her long
lashes to keep her eyes moist and soft.

The sun was on Evelyn Clifford's hair, burnishing it to a halo of gold
under the white hat. She looked radiantly beautiful, and as happy as if
her soul were singing a Christmas Carol. On the face of Hugh Egerton was
a look which no woman could mistake, least of all such a woman as Julie
de Lavalette; and it was not for her, never would be for her.

Now she knew why her expected guest had not come last night, or
remembered to send an excuse. Sick with jealousy and spite, she bowed as
she passed, trying to look eighteen, and tenderly reproachful.

Her bow was returned, indifferently by Evelyn, but by Hugh with eyes of
steel, and a mouth of bronze. If he had cut her, he would have shown
less contempt than in that stiff raising of the hat.

Julie turned and walked straight down to the Condamine, forgetting that
her shoes were tight.




[Illustration: CHAPTER NINE]

THE LAST WORD OF MADEMOISELLE


[Illustration: R]

Rosemary chose the toys for the children of the rock village, and then
the "picnic" began.

The car whizzed them up the zigzag road to La Turbie, while the noon
sunshine still gilded Caesar's Trophy. They lunched in the Moorish
restaurant, and then sped on along the Upper Corniche, with a white sea
of snow mountains billowing away to the right, and a sea of sapphire
spreading to the horizon, on their left.

Out from orange groves and olives they saw the hill of Éze rising like a
horn; while on its almost pointed apex, the old town hung like some
carved fetish, to keep away the witches.

The car swooped down, and up again; but half way up the rocky horn the
wide white road turned into a stone paved mule path, old as the Romans.
Evelyn and Rosemary climbed hand in hand, singing a Christmas carol,
while Hugh carried the two huge baskets filled with toys, and sweets in
little packets.

Some small sentinel perched on high (perhaps hidden among the ruins of
that fortress-castle where once the temple of Isis stood) must have
spied the odd procession; for as the tall white girl and the little blue
one, with the brown young man, reached the last step of the steep mule
path, a tidal wave of children swept down upon them, out from the
mystery of dark tunnelled streets.

Such eyes were never seen as those that gleamed at the new comers, great
with surprise and wonder; eyes of brown velvet with diamonds shining
through; eyes like black wells, with mirrored stars in their unfathomed
depths; eyes of wild deer; eyes of fierce Saracens; eyes of baby saints,
all set in small bronze faces clear-cut as the profiles on ancient Roman
coins.

"Bella Madonna, bella Madonna!" piped a tiny voice, and forty other
voices caught up the adoring cry.

The brown children of the old rock village had poured down from their
high eyrie to bombard the strangers from the world below; to stare, to
beg, to laugh, to lisp out strange epithets in their crude _patois_; but
at sight of the wonderful white lady and her gold-haired child they
crowded back upon each other, hushed after their first cry into awed
admiration for visitants from another world.

Few tourists climbed to their dark fastness, and of those who came none
had ever shone with such blinding radiance of white and gold.

It was certain that the lovely lady was none other than the Madonna
herself, and the child she had brought was some baby angel. The man
alone was mortal. He had perhaps been bidden to show la bella Madonna
the way to Éze.

Rosemary, shy but happy, began giving out the toys, diving with both
hands at once into the baskets which the fairy father held. Trumpets,
bags of marbles, tops and furry animals for the boys, according to their
age; (oh, Rosemary was a good judge, and never hesitated once!) Dolls
for the girls, dolls by the dozen, dolls by the legion; and sweets for
all.

As the amazed children received their gifts, they fell respectfully
back, as if they had received an order to give place to their
companions, and others came forward, open mouthed, large eyed, ready to
fall upon their knees if but one of their number should set an example.

Still there were toys left, toys in abundance; the wondrous benefactors
passed slowly on, always going up, up into the huddled village
streets--tunnelled in rock or arched with stone, where eager, astonished
faces peered from the mystery of shadowed doorways, and the hum of joy
and admiration swelled to a sound like the murmur of the sea.

Of grown folk there were not many. A few mothers with brown babies in
their arms; a few mumbling crones, and bent old men with faces like
strange masks; but the flow of children never ceased.

As the children of Hamlin followed the Pied Piper to the sea, so the
black browed children of Éze followed the Christmas visitors from
crooked street to crooked street, up to the castle ruins and back again.
They did not shout as they took their gifts; but still the murmur ran
from mouth to mouth: "Bella Madonna, bella Madonna."

At the end of an enchanted hour, when there was not a child in Éze who
had not both hands full, the benefactors turned to go, with empty
baskets. Massed on the plateau above the mule-path, the whole population
of the village stood to watch them down the steep descent. As they went,
the church bells of Éze boomed out, calling all pious souls, young and
old, to vespers; and as if the loosened tongues of the bells loosened
also the tongues of the children, at last there arose a cry.

"Come again, Bella Madonna and little angel, come again. We shall pray
to see you next Christmas Day, Bella Madonna and little angel. Don't
forget, next Christmas Day."

       *       *       *       *       *

"I'm perfectly happy, dearest," said Rosemary, when once more they sat
in the car, spinning back from the shaded eyrie to the fair world where
the sunshine lay.

The others did not speak, but the same thought was in their hearts.

When you are positively bursting with happiness the best outlet for the
surplus quantity is to benefit somebody else; and there is no time like
Christmas for a successful experiment.

"What else can we do for somebody?" asked Hugh.

"There's Jane," suggested Rosemary. "I told her this morning how I went
out and found a father, and she said Pooh, he was all in my eye; and
besides she'd never heard of fathers growing on blackberry bushes. But
if we bought her a present, and you gave it to her yourself, she'd have
to believe in you."

"I shan't feel I have a sure hold on existence until she does," said
Hugh. "Let's buy her something without the loss of a moment."

So they bought Jane a ring, which Rosemary chose herself after mature
deliberation, and with due regard to the recipient's somewhat pronounced
taste in colours.

"She admires red and green together more than anything," said the child,
"and I want her to have what she really likes, because if it hadn't been
for her I shouldn't have known Christmas Eve was the time to search for
fathers. Just supposing somebody else had gone out and snapped him up
instead of me!"

As a matter of fact somebody else had gone out, and had come very near
indeed to snapping him up; but there are things which do not bear
thinking of. It was Hugh's firm conviction that Destiny and not Jane,
had flung Rosemary in front of his motor; but Destiny could not be
rewarded and Jane could.

Rosemary would be satisfied with nothing less than a formal
presentation; and that the ceremony might be gone through without delay,
the car was directed towards the Condamine. As they neared the street of
the Hotel Pension Beau Soleil, a cab came jingling round the corner.

It was occupied by two ladies who sat half buried in travelling bags,
rugs, baskets, and shawl straps, such as women who are not of the Anglo
Saxon races love. A tiny motorphobe in the shape of a black Pomeranian
yapped viciously at the automobile as the vehicles passed each other;
and though the ladies--one stout, the other slim--were thickly veiled,
Rosemary cried out, "Oh, it's the Comtesse and Mademoiselle. They must
be going away."

Hugh said nothing, but his silence was eloquent to Evelyn, who knew now
the whole story of the girl with the soft eyes. Both were pleased that
this was the last of her; but neither quite knew Mademoiselle de
Lavalette. She had been busy with other matters besides her packing,
while la bella Madonna and her suite were collecting adorers on the
heights of Éze.

Evelyn and Rosemary disappeared to take off their hats before the grand
presentation ceremony should begin, and Hugh had begun to occupy the
time of their absence by lighting the fire with pine cones, when a cry
from the beloved voice called him to the room adjoining.

The door was open, and the woman and the child stood dumbfounded and
overwhelmed in a scene of incredible desolation.

The air was acrid with the smell of burning. Blouses, pink and green,
and cream, and blue, were stirred into a seething mass in the fireplace,
as in a witch's cauldron, their fluffy laces burnt and blackened.
Chiffon fichus torn in ribbons strewed the carpet. An ivory fan had been
trampled into fragments on the hearth-rug, and a snow-storm of feathers
from a white boa had drifted over the furniture. On the wash-stand a
spangled white tulle hat lay drowning in a basin half full of water.

[Illustration: Their fluffy laces burnt and blackened. Chiffon fichus
torn in ribbons strewed the carpet.                          Page 138.

                                                          --_Rosemary._]

It was a sight to turn the brain of Madame in the magasin of smart
"confections," nor would the presiding genius of the toy shop have gone
scathless, for Rosemary's possessions had not been spared by the
cyclone.

Dolls had lost their wigs, their arms, their legs; and beautiful blue
eyes had been poked into far recesses of porcelain heads, with ruthless
scissors. Little dresses of silk and satin had been flung to feed the
flames which devoured ill-starred blouses; picture books had made fine
kindlings; and that proud and stately mansion which might have afforded
shelter to many dolls had collapsed as if shattered by a cyclone.

"Oh, Angel, is it some dreadful dream?" wailed Rosemary; and Evelyn
found no answer. But Hugh had pounced upon a card pinned on the window
curtain; and as he held it out, in eloquent silence, she read aloud over
his shoulder; "Compliments of Mademoiselle de Lavalette."

At the end of the first shocked instant, they both laughed wildly,
desperately. It was the only thing to do.

"After all," gasped Evelyn, "she has paid me back--what she owed
me,--and Rosemary."

"She's given me the pleasure of making Christmas come all over again,
to-morrow, that's all," said Hugh. "Women are strange. Thank heaven,
_she_ has vanished."

"But nothing matters--at least not much," said Rosemary, smiling through
her tears, "since you're not going to vanish, fairy father."


THE END

       *       *       *       *       *

Transcriber's Notes:

Punctuation normalized.

Page 117, Eze changed to Éze to match rest of text (Éze children).

Page 122, bêt changed to bête (la petite bête).





End of Project Gutenberg's Rosemary, by C. N. Williamson and A. M. Williamson

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ROSEMARY ***

***** This file should be named 17743-8.txt or 17743-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/1/7/7/4/17743/

Produced by Suzanne Shell, Emmy and the Online Distributed
Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
